District of Columbia statutes.
29-103.03

Reservation of name.

(a)

A person may reserve the exclusive use of an entity name by delivering an application to the Mayor for filing. The application shall state the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the Mayor finds that the entity name applied for is available, the Mayor shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a 120-day period.

(b)

The owner of a reserved entity name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the Mayor a signed notice in a record of the transfer which states the name and address of the transferee.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-103.01 and § 47-2855.02.